Indiana, session 2026, HB1311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-14-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.64-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Any person may inspect and copy the public
records of any public agency during the regular business hours of the
agency, except as provided in section 4 of this chapter. A request for
inspection or copying must:
(1) identify with reasonable particularity the record being
requested; and
(2) be, at the discretion of the agency, in writing on or in a form
provided by the agency.
No request may be denied because the person making the request
refuses to state the purpose of the request, unless such condition is
required by other applicable statute. If a request is for inspection or
copying of a law enforcement recording, the request must provide the
information required under subsection (i).
(b) A public agency may not deny or interfere with the exercise of
the right stated in subsection (a). If the public agency does not deny the
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


request, within a reasonable time after the request is received by the
agency the public agency shall either: do one (1) of the following:
(1) Provide the requested copies to the person making the request.
or
(2) Allow the person to make copies (A) on the agency's
equipment. or
(B) (3) Allow the person to make copies on the person's own
equipment. However, a person may not make copies of a
document recorded in the office of the county recorder using
the person's own equipment.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a public agency may or
may not do the following:
(1) In accordance with a contract described in section 3.5 of this
chapter, permit a person to inspect and copy through the use of
enhanced access public records containing information owned by
or entrusted to the public agency.
(2) Permit a governmental entity to use an electronic device to
inspect and copy public records containing information owned by
or entrusted to the public agency.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) and subject to subsection
(j), a public agency that maintains or contracts for the maintenance of
public records in an electronic data storage system shall make
reasonable efforts to provide to a person making a request a copy of all
disclosable data contained in the records on paper, disk, tape, drum, or
any other method of electronic retrieval if the medium requested is
compatible with the agency's data storage system. This subsection does
not apply to an electronic map.
(e) A state agency may adopt a rule under IC 4-22-2, and a political
subdivision may enact an ordinance, prescribing the conditions under
which a person who receives information on disk or tape under
subsection (d) may or may not use the information for commercial
purposes, including to sell, advertise, or solicit the purchase of
merchandise, goods, or services, or sell, loan, give away, or otherwise
deliver the information obtained by the request to any other person for
these purposes. Use of information received under subsection (d) in
connection with the preparation or publication of news, for nonprofit
activities, or for academic research is not prohibited. A person who
uses information in a manner contrary to a rule or ordinance adopted
under this subsection may be prohibited by the state agency or political
subdivision from obtaining a copy or any further data under subsection
(d).
(f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a public
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


agency is not required to create or provide copies of lists of names and
addresses (including electronic mail account addresses) unless the
public agency is required to publish such lists and disseminate them to
the public under a statute. However, if a public agency has created a
list of names and addresses (excluding electronic mail account
addresses), it must permit a person to inspect and make memoranda
abstracts from the list unless access to the list is prohibited by law. The
lists of names and addresses (including electronic mail account
addresses) described in subdivisions (1) through (3) may not be
disclosed by public agencies to any individual or entity for political
purposes and may not be used by any individual or entity for political
purposes. In addition, the lists of names and addresses (including
electronic mail account addresses) described in subdivisions (1)
through (3) may not be disclosed by public agencies to commercial
entities for commercial purposes and may not be used by commercial
entities for commercial purposes. The prohibition in this subsection
against the disclosure of lists for political or commercial purposes
applies to the following lists of names and addresses (including
electronic mail account addresses):
(1) A list of employees of a public agency.
(2) A list of persons attending conferences or meetings at a state
educational institution or of persons involved in programs or
activities conducted or supervised by the state educational
institution.
(3) A list of students who are enrolled in a public school
corporation if the governing body of the public school corporation
adopts a policy:
(A) with respect to disclosure related to a commercial purpose,
prohibiting the disclosure of the list to commercial entities for
commercial purposes;
(B) with respect to disclosure related to a commercial purpose,
specifying the classes or categories of commercial entities to
which the list may not be disclosed or by which the list may
not be used for commercial purposes; or
(C) with respect to disclosure related to a political purpose,
prohibiting the disclosure of the list to individuals and entities
for political purposes.
A policy adopted under subdivision (3)(A) or (3)(B) must be uniform
and may not discriminate among similarly situated commercial entities.
For purposes of this subsection, "political purposes" means influencing
the election of a candidate for federal, state, legislative, local, or school
board office or the outcome of a public question or attempting to solicit
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


a contribution to influence the election of a candidate for federal, state,
legislative, local, or school board office or the outcome of a public
question.
(g) A public agency may not enter into or renew a contract or an
obligation:
(1) for the storage or copying of public records; or
(2) that requires the public to obtain a license or pay copyright
royalties for obtaining the right to inspect and copy the records
unless otherwise provided by applicable statute;
if the contract, obligation, license, or copyright unreasonably impairs
the right of the public to inspect and copy the agency's public records.
(h) If this section conflicts with IC 3-7, the provisions of IC 3-7
apply.
(i) A request to inspect or copy a law enforcement recording must
be in writing. A request identifies a law enforcement recording with
reasonable particularity as required by this section only if the request
provides the following information regarding the law enforcement
activity depicted in the recording:
(1) The date and approximate time of the law enforcement
activity.
(2) The specific location where the law enforcement activity
occurred.
(3) The name of at least one (1) individual, other than a law
enforcement officer, who was directly involved in the law
enforcement activity.
(j) This subsection applies to a public record that is in an electronic
format. This subsection does not apply to a public record recorded in
the office of the county recorder. A public agency shall provide an
electronic copy or a paper copy of a public record, at the option of the
person making the request for the public record. This subsection does
not require a public agency to change the format of a public record.
SECTION 2. IC 5-14-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.287-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) For the purposes of this section, "state
agency" has the meaning set forth in IC 4-13-1-1.
(b) Except as provided in this section, a public agency may not
charge any fee under this chapter for the following:
(1) To inspect a public record.
(2) This subdivision applies only to a school corporation and a
charter school. This subdivision does not apply to a request for a
search by an exclusive representative (as defined in
IC 20-29-2-9). To search for a record that is in an electronic
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


format, if the search does not exceed five (5) hours.
(3) Subject to subdivision (2), to search for, examine, or review
a record to determine whether the record may be disclosed.
(4) To provide an electronic copy of a public record by electronic
mail. However, a public agency may charge a fee for a public
record transmitted by electronic mail if the fee for the public
record is authorized under:
(A) subsection (f) or (j);
(B) section 6(c) of this chapter; or
(C) IC 36-2-7-10 or IC 36-2-7-10.1 concerning records of the
county recorder.
(c) The Indiana department of administration shall establish a
uniform copying fee for the copying of one (1) page of a standard-sized
document by state agencies. The fee may not exceed the average cost
of copying records by state agencies or ten cents ($0.10) per page,
whichever is greater. A state agency may not collect more than the
uniform copying fee for providing a copy of a public record. However,
a state agency shall establish and collect a reasonable fee for copying
nonstandard-sized documents.
(d) This subsection applies to a public agency that is not a state
agency. The fiscal body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-6) of the public
agency, or the governing body, if there is no fiscal body, shall establish
a fee schedule for the certification or copying of documents. The fee for
certification of documents may not exceed five dollars ($5) per
document. The fee for copying documents may not exceed the greater
of:
(1) ten cents ($0.10) per page for copies that are not color copies
or twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page for color copies; or
(2) the actual cost to the agency of copying the document.
As used in this subsection, "actual cost" means the cost of paper and
the per-page cost for use of copying or facsimile equipment and does
not include labor costs or overhead costs. A fee established under this
subsection must be uniform throughout the public agency and uniform
to all purchasers.
(e) If:
(1) a person is entitled to a copy of a public record under this
chapter; and
(2) the public agency which is in possession of the record has
reasonable access to a machine capable of reproducing the public
record;
the public agency must provide at least one (1) copy of the public
record to the person. However, if a public agency does not have
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


reasonable access to a machine capable of reproducing the record or if
the person cannot reproduce the record by use of enhanced access
under section 3.5 of this chapter, the person is only entitled to inspect
and manually transcribe the record. A public agency may require that
the payment for search and copying costs be made in advance.
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (b), (c), (d), (g), (h), or (i), a public
agency shall collect any certification, copying, facsimile machine
transmission, or search fee that is specified by statute or is ordered by
a court.
(g) Except as provided by subsection (h), for providing a duplicate
of a computer tape, computer disc, microfilm, law enforcement
recording, or similar or analogous record system containing
information owned by the public agency or entrusted to it, a public
agency may charge a fee, uniform to all purchasers, that does not
exceed the sum of the following:
(1) The agency's direct cost of supplying the information in that
form. However, the fee for a copy of a law enforcement recording
may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(2) The standard cost for selling the same information to the
public in the form of a publication if the agency has published the
information and made the publication available for sale.
(3) In the case of the legislative services agency, a reasonable
percentage of the agency's direct cost of maintaining the system
in which the information is stored. However, the amount charged
by the legislative services agency under this subdivision may not
exceed the sum of the amounts it may charge under subdivisions
(1) and (2).
(h) This subsection applies to the fee charged by a public agency for
providing enhanced access to a public record. A public agency may
charge any reasonable fee agreed on in the contract under section 3.5
of this chapter for providing enhanced access to public records.
(i) This subsection applies to the fee charged by a public agency for
permitting a governmental entity to inspect public records by means of
an electronic device. A public agency may charge any reasonable fee
for the inspection of public records under this subsection, or the public
agency may waive any fee for the inspection.
(j) Except as provided in subsection (k), a public agency may charge
a fee, uniform to all purchasers, for providing an electronic map that is
based upon a reasonable percentage of the agency's direct cost of
maintaining, upgrading, and enhancing the electronic map and for the
direct cost of supplying the electronic map in the form requested by the
purchaser. If the public agency is within a political subdivision having
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


a fiscal body, the fee is subject to the approval of the fiscal body of the
political subdivision.
(k) The fee charged by a public agency under subsection (j) to cover
costs for maintaining, upgrading, and enhancing an electronic map may
be waived by the public agency if the electronic map for which the fee
is charged will be used for a noncommercial purpose, including the
following:
(1) Public agency program support.
(2) Nonprofit activities.
(3) Journalism.
(4) Academic research.
(l) This subsection does not apply to a state agency. A fee collected
under subsection (g) for the copying of a law enforcement recording
may be:
(1) retained by the public agency; and
(2) used without appropriation for one (1) or more of the
following purposes:
(A) To purchase cameras and other equipment for use in
connection with the agency's law enforcement recording
program.
(B) For training concerning law enforcement recording.
(C) To defray the expenses of storing, producing, and copying
law enforcement recordings.
Money from a fee described in this subsection does not revert to the
local general fund at the end of a fiscal year.
(m) This subsection applies to a school corporation and a charter
school. For purposes of this subsection, "computer processing time"
means the amount of time a computer takes to process a command or
script to extract or copy electronically stored data that is the subject of
a public records request. A school corporation or charter school may
not charge a fee for the first five (5) hours required to search for
records that are in an electronic format. A school corporation or charter
school may charge a search fee for any time spent searching for records
that are in an electronic format that exceeds five (5) hours. If the school
corporation or charter school charges a search fee, the school
corporation or charter school shall charge an hourly fee that does not
exceed the lesser of:
(1) the hourly rate of the person making the search; or
(2) twenty dollars ($20) per hour.
A school corporation or charter school charging an hourly fee under
this subsection for searching for records that are in an electronic format
may charge only for time that the person making the search actually
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


spends in searching for the records that are in an electronic format. A
school corporation or charter school may not charge for computer
processing time and may not establish a minimum fee for searching for
records that are in an electronic format. A school corporation or charter
school shall make a good faith effort to complete a search for records
that are in an electronic format that is within a reasonable time in order
to minimize the amount of a search fee. The fee must be prorated to
reflect any search time of less than one (1) hour.
(n) The county recorder shall charge the fees set forth in
IC 36-2-7-10 for copying documents.
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Local Government, to which was
referred House Bill 1311, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1311 as introduced.)
MAY
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0
HB 1311—LS 6934/DI 87